Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1016.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and sections 2, 3(b) and (c), 4, 5(d), 8, 11 and 29 of the act of June 13, 2008 (P.L.182, No.27), known as the Clean Indoor Air Act, are amended to read:AN ACTRegulating smoking in this Commonwealth; imposing powers and duties on the Department of Health and local boards of health; providing penalties; [preempting local action;] and making [a related repeal] related repeals.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718192021 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Adult day care." As defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code."Child-care services." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303 (relating to definitions)."Cigar bar." Any of the following:(1) An establishment which, on the effective date of this section, operates pursuant to an eating place retail dispenser's or restaurant liquor license under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, and is physically connected by a door, passageway or other opening and directly adjacent to a tobacco shop.(2) An establishment which, at any time, operates pursuant to an eating place retail dispenser's license, malt or brewed beverage distributor's license or restaurant liquor license under the Liquor Code, and has total annual sales of tobacco products, including tobacco, accessories or cigar storage lockers or humidors of at least 15% of the combined gross sales of the establishment."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.["Drinking establishment." Any of the following:(1) An establishment which:(i) operates pursuant to an eating place retail dispenser's license, restaurant liquor license or retail dispenser's license under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code;(ii) has total annual sales of food sold for on-premises consumption of less than or equal to 20% of the combined gross sales of the establishment; and(iii) does not permit individuals under 18 years of 20250SB1016PN1175 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 age.(2) An enclosed area within an establishment which, on the effective date of this section:(i) operates pursuant to an eating place retail dispenser's license, restaurant liquor license or retail dispenser's license under the Liquor Code;(ii) is a physically connected or directly adjacent enclosed area which is separate from the eating area, has a separate air system and has a separate outside entrance;(iii) has total annual sales of food sold for on-premises consumption of less than or equal to 20% of the combined gross sales within the permitted smoking area of the establishment; and(iv) does not permit individuals under 18 years of age.The term does not include a nightclub.]"Electronic smoking device." An electronic device that contains or delivers nicotine or another substance to an individual inhaling from the device. The term includes any device, whether manufactured, distributed, marketed or sold as an electronic nicotine delivery system, electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic pipe, vape pen or other electronic device under any other product name or descriptor.["Full-service truck stop." An establishment catering to long-haul truck drivers that provides shower facilities for a fee."Gaming floor." Any portion of a licensed facility where slot machines have been installed for use or play as approved by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board. The term does not include 20250SB1016PN1175 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an area adjacent to the gaming floor, including any hallway, reception area, retail space, bar, nightclub, restaurant, hotel, entertainment venue or office space."Licensed facility." As defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions)."Night club." A public hall or hall for which admission is generally charged and which is primarily or predominantly devoted to dancing or to shows or cabarets as opposed to a facility that is primarily a bar, tavern or dining facility.]"Patio." An outdoor deck or similar outdoor service area enclosed on no more than two sides which is part of an establishment that serves food or drinks."Private club." An organization which is any of the following:(1) A reputable group of individuals associated together as an organization for legitimate purposes of mutual benefit, entertainment, fellowship or lawful convenience which does all of the following:(i) Regularly and exclusively occupies, as owner or lessee, a clubhouse or quarter for the use of its members.(ii) Holds regular meetings; conducts its business through officers regularly elected; admits members by written application, investigation and ballot; and charges and collects dues from elected members.(iii) Has been in continuous existence for a period of [ten] 25 years as such an organization.[(2) A volunteer ambulance service.(3) A volunteer fire company.(4) A volunteer rescue company.]20250SB1016PN1175 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Public meeting." A meeting open to the public. The term includes a meeting under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings)."Public place." An [enclosed] area which serves as a workplace, commercial establishment, transit vehicle or an area where the public is invited or permitted. [The term includes:(1) A facility which provides education, food or health care-related services.(2) A vehicle used for mass transportation. This paragraph includes a train, subway, bus, including a chartered bus, plane, taxicab and limousine.(3) A train station, subway station or bus station.(4) A public facility. This paragraph includes a facility to which the public is invited or in which the public is permitted and a private home which provides child-care or adult day-care services.(5) A sports or recreational facility, theater or performance establishment.] The term includes the space within at least 20 feet of a public entrance to the area, a sports or recreational facility, theater or performance establishment, park and playground. The term does not include a street or patio.["Smoking." The carrying by a person of a lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe or other lighted smoking device.]"Smoking." Inhaling, exhaling, burning or carrying any lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, pipe or any other lighted or heated tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation, including marijuana, whether natural or synthetic, in any manner or form. The term includes the use of an electronic smoking device which creates an aerosol or vapor, in any manner or form.20250SB1016PN1175 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tobacco shop." A business establishment whose sales of tobacco and tobacco-related products, including cigars, pipe tobacco and smoking accessories, comprise at least 50% of the gross annual sales. This term does not include a stand-alone kiosk or establishment comprised solely of cigarette vending machines.["Volunteer ambulance service." As defined in section 102 of the act of July 31, 2003 (P.L.73, No.17), known as the Volunteer Fire Company and Volunteer Ambulance Service Grant Act."Volunteer fire company." As defined in section 102 of the act of July 31, 2003 (P.L.73, No.17), known as the Volunteer Fire Company and Volunteer Ambulance Service Grant Act."Volunteer rescue company." As defined in section 102 of the act of July 31, 2003 (P.L.73, No.17), known as the Volunteer Fire Company and Volunteer Ambulance Service Grant Act.]"Workplace." An [indoor] area serving as a place of employment, occupation, business, trade, craft, professional or volunteer activity. The term includes work areas, private offices, employee lounges, restrooms, conference rooms, meeting rooms, classrooms, employee cafeterias, hallways, construction sites, temporary offices and work vehicles.Section 3. Prohibition.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A private home, private residence or private vehicle unless the private home, private residence or private vehicle is [being used at the] used at the time for the provision of [child-care services, adult day-care services or services related to the care of children and youth in State or county 20250SB1016PN1175 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custody.(2) Designated quarters:(i) within a lodging establishment which are available for rent to guests accounting for no more than 25% of the total number of lodging units within a single lodging establishment; or(ii) within a full-service truck stop.] any of the following:(i) Child-care services at a group child care home as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3280.4 (relating to definitions).(ii) Child-care services at a family child care home as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3290.4 (relating to definitions).(iii) Adult day care services.(iv) Services related to the care of children and youth in State or county custody.(v) Early intervention services.(3) A tobacco shop.(4) A workplace of a manufacturer, importer or wholesaler of tobacco products; a manufacturer of tobacco-related products, including lighters; a tobacco leaf dealer or processor; or a tobacco storage facility.[(5) Any of the following residential facilities:(i) A long-term care facility regulated under 42 CFR 483.15 (relating to quality of life). This subparagraph shall not apply if 42 CFR 483.15 is abrogated or expires.(ii) A separate enclosed room or designated smoking room in a residential adult care facility, community mental health care facility, drug and alcohol facility or 20250SB1016PN1175 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other residential health care facility not covered under subparagraph (i).(iii) A designated smoking room in a facility which provides day treatment programs.](6) Subject to subsection (c)(2), a private club, except where the club is:(i) open to the public through general advertisement for a club-sponsored event; or(ii) leased or used for a private event which is not club sponsored.[(7) A place where a fundraiser is conducted by a nonprofit and charitable organization one time per year if all of the following apply:(i) The place is separate from other public areas during the event.(ii) Food and beverages are available to attendees.(iii) Individuals under 18 years of age are not permitted to attend.(iv) Cigars are sold, auctioned or given as gifts, and cigars are a feature of the event.(8) An exhibition hall, conference room, catering hall or similar facility used exclusively for an event to which the public is invited for the primary purpose of promoting or sampling tobacco products, subject to the following:(i) All of the following must be met:(A) Service of food and drink is incidental.(B) The sponsor or organizer gives notice in all advertisements and other promotional materials that smoking will not be restricted.(C) At least 75% of all products displayed or 20250SB1016PN1175 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributed at the event are tobacco or tobacco-related products.(D) Notice that smoking will not be restricted is prominently posted at the entrance to the facility.(ii) A single retailer, manufacturer or distributor of tobacco may not conduct more than six days of a promotional event under this paragraph in any calendar year.](9) A cigar bar that is not part of a licensed facility.[(10) A drinking establishment.(11) Unless otherwise increased under this paragraph, 25% of the gaming floor at a licensed facility. No earlier than 90 days following the effective date of this section or the date of commencement of slot machine operations at a licensed facility, whichever is later, a licensed facility shall request a report from the Department of Revenue that analyzes the gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in operation at the licensed facility within the 90-day period preceding the request. If the report shows that the average gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in the designated smoking area equals or exceeds the average gross terminal revenue per slot machine unit in the designated nonsmoking area, the licensed facility may increase the designated smoking area of the gaming floor in proportion to the percentage difference in revenue. A licensed facility may request this report from the Department of Revenue on a quarterly basis and may increase the designated smoking area of the gaming floor accordingly. At no time may the designated smoking area exceed 50% of the gaming floor. The 20250SB1016PN1175 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board shall have jurisdiction to verify the gross terminal revenues included in the report to ensure compliance with the requirements under this paragraph. Movement of the licensed facility from a temporary facility to a permanent facility shall not require the licensed facility to revert to the minimum percentage set forth under this paragraph.(12) A designated outdoor smoking area within the confines of a sports or recreational facility, theater or performance establishment.](13) A patio.(c) Conditions and qualifications for exceptions.--(1) In order to be excepted under subsection (b), a [drinking establishment,] cigar bar or tobacco shop must submit a letter, accompanied by verifiable supporting documentation, to the department claiming an exception under subsection (b). Exception shall be based upon the establishment's books, accounts, revenues or receipts, including those reported to the Department of Revenue for sales tax purposes, from the previous year or stated projected annual revenues, which shall be verified within six months.(2) [In order to qualify for the exception under subsection (b)(6), a private club must take and record a vote of its officers under the bylaws to address smoking in the private club's facilities.] In order to qualify for the exception under subsection (b)(6), be ginning January 1, 2026, and each odd-numbered year thereafter, a private club must take and record a vote of the private club's members in good standing in accordance with the private club's bylaws to address smoking in the private club's facilities. Th e vote 20250SB1016PN1175 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall take place between September 15 and November 15 of each odd-numbered year. The private club shall submit the results of the vote to the department by December 15 of each odd-numbered year. The results of a vote under this paragraph shall be in effect for the two-year period from January 1 of the even-numbered year following the vote until December 31 of the next odd-numbered year. The following shall apply:(i) The department shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post a notice on the department's publicly accessible Internet website of the physical address and email address for a private club to submit the results of the vote under this paragraph. A private club may submit the results of the vote under this paragraph via first class mail or email. The department shall develop a form that may be used by a private club to submit the results of the vote under this paragraph, which shall include all of the following:(A) The name and address of the private club.(B) The date of the vote.(C) The results of the vote.(D) Contact information for a member of the private club who oversaw the vote of the private club's members.(ii) If a private club fails to take and record a vote or submit the results of the vote to the department under this paragraph, smoking shall be prohibited in the private club's facilities for the two-year period from January 1 of the even-numbered year following when the vote was to take place to December 31 of the next odd-20250SB1016PN1175 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 numbered year.(iii) As used in this paragraph, the term "members in good standing" shall mean members who have met the requirements under the bylaws of a private club for a minimum period of six months preceding a vote under this paragraph.Section 4. Signage."Smoking Permitted" or "No Smoking" signs or the international "No Smoking" symbol, which consists of a pictorial representation of a burning cigarette and electronic smoking device in a circle with a bar across it, shall be prominently posted and properly maintained where smoking is regulated by this act by the owner, operator, manager or other person having control of the area. A "Smoking Permitted" sign shall be prominently posted and maintained at every entrance to a public place where smoking is permitted under this act. Signage requirements shall not apply to parties exempt under section 3(b)(1).Section 5. Enforcement.* * *(d) Access to records.--A [drinking establishment,] cigar bar and tobacco shop shall make available all books, accounts, revenues, receipts and other information to the department, the Department of Revenue, the State licensing agency or a county board of health as necessary to enforce this act. All information submitted to the Department of Health, a county board or other Commonwealth agency with enforcement duties under this act[, including information to verify the on-site food consumption of a drinking establishment,] shall be confidential and shall not be subject to the act of June 21, 1957 (P.L.390, 20250SB1016PN1175 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.212), referred to as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 8. Annual reports.(a) Requirement.--The department shall file an annual report by December 1 with the chairman and minority chairman of the [Public] Health and [Welfare] Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairman and minority chairman of the Health [and Human Services] Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The report shall include:(1) The number of violations of this act by county as reported to the department.(2) The number of enforcement actions initiated under this act by the department, by another State licensing agency or by a county board of health.(3) A description of the enforcement activities of the department. This paragraph includes the number of personnel assigned to enforce this act, enforcement strategies undertaken by the department or a licensing agency and other information relating to the administration and implementation of this act.Section 11. [Preemption of local ordinances.(a) General rule.--Except as set forth in subsection (b), the following apply:(1) This act shall supersede any ordinance, resolution or regulation adopted by a political subdivision concerning smoking in a public place.(2) No political subdivision shall have the authority to adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation or resolution which is in conflict with this act.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a city of the first class. A city of the first class may not change or 20250SB1016PN1175 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amend its ordinance to conflict with any provision of this act.] Effect on local rules and ordinances.This act shall not be construed to restrict the power of a political subdivision to adopt and enforce any rule or ordinance that exceeds the minimum applicable standards under this act.Section 29. [Repeal] Repeals.(a) Intent.--The General Assembly declares that the [repeal] repeals under subsection (b) [is] are necessary to effectuate this act.(b) [Provision.--Section 10.1 of the act of April 27, 1927 (P.L.465, No.299), referred to as the Fire and Panic Act, is repealed.] Provisions.--The following parts of acts are repealed:(1) Section 10.1 of the act of April 27, 1927 (P.L.465, No.299), referred to as the Fire and Panic Act.(2) Section 15.1 of the Fire and Panic Act insofar as it relates to clean indoor air.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1016PN1175 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718